tests/verbs-TIA.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    App: hfst-optimised-lookup
    Gen: ../unm.autogen.hfst
    Morph: ../unm.automorf.hfst

Tests:
  
  "[lexc/twol] (Ch5) tv.nn p1.sg":
    nem<v><tv><nn><p1><sg><o_sg> : nemen
    nem<v><tv><nn><p1><sg><o_pl> : nemena
    penam<v><tv><nn><p1><sg><o_sg> : mpenamen
    penam<v><tv><nn><p1><sg><o_pl> : mpenamena
    wixeni<v><tv><nn><p1><sg><o_sg> : newixenin
    wixeni<v><tv><nn><p1><sg><o_pl> : newixenina
    katatam<v><tv><nn><p1><sg><o_sg> : nkatatamen
    katatam<v><tv><nn><p1><sg><o_pl> : nkatatamena
    katutam<v><tv><nn><p1><sg><o_sg> : nkatutamen
    katutam<v><tv><nn><p1><sg><o_pl> : nkatutamena
    shinkatam<v><tv><nn><p1><sg><o_sg> : nshinkatamen
    shinkatam<v><tv><nn><p1><sg><o_pl> : nshinkatamena
    hatun<v><tv><nn><p1><sg><o_sg> : nulhatun
    hatun<v><tv><nn><p1><sg><o_pl> : nulhatuna

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch6) tv.nn p1.sg":
    papitu<v><tv><nn><p1><sg><o_sg> : mpapitun
    papitu<v><tv><nn><p1><sg><o_pl> : mpapituna
    pentam<v><tv><nn><p1><sg><o_sg> : mpentamen
    pentam<v><tv><nn><p1><sg><o_pl> : mpentamena
    pahsenem<v><tv><nn><p1><sg><o_sg> : mpahsenemen
    pahsenem<v><tv><nn><p1><sg><o_pl> : mpahsenemena
  
  "[lexc/twol] (Ch5) tv.nn p2.sg":
    nem<v><tv><nn><p2><sg><o_sg> : kenemen
    nem<v><tv><nn><p2><sg><o_pl> : kenemena
    penam<v><tv><nn><p2><sg><o_sg> : kepenamen
    penam<v><tv><nn><p2><sg><o_pl> : kepenamena
    wixeni<v><tv><nn><p2><sg><o_sg> : kewixenin
    wixeni<v><tv><nn><p2><sg><o_pl> : kewixenina
    katatam<v><tv><nn><p2><sg><o_sg> : katatamen
    katatam<v><tv><nn><p2><sg><o_pl> : katatamena  
    katutam<v><tv><nn><p2><sg><o_sg> : katutamen
    katutam<v><tv><nn><p2><sg><o_pl> : katutamena
    shinkatam<v><tv><nn><p2><sg><o_sg> : kshinkatamen
    shinkatam<v><tv><nn><p2><sg><o_pl> : kshinkatamena
    hatun<v><tv><nn><p2><sg><o_sg> : kulhatun
    hatun<v><tv><nn><p2><sg><o_pl> : kulhatuna

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch6) tv.nn p2.sg":
    papitu<v><tv><nn><p2><sg><o_sg> : kpapitun
    papitu<v><tv><nn><p2><sg><o_pl> : kpapituna
    pentam<v><tv><nn><p2><sg><o_sg> : kpentamen
    pentam<v><tv><nn><p2><sg><o_pl> : kpentamena
    pahsenem<v><tv><nn><p2><sg><o_sg> : kpahsenemen
    pahsenem<v><tv><nn><p2><sg><o_pl> : kpahsenemena

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch5) tv.nn p3.sg":
    nem<v><tv><nn><p2><sg><o_sg> : wenemen
    nem<v><tv><nn><p2><sg><o_pl> : wenemena
    penam<v><tv><nn><p2><sg><o_sg> : pwenamen
    penam<v><tv><nn><p2><sg><o_pl> : pwenamen
    wixeni<v><tv><nn><p2><sg><o_sg> : wixenin
    wixeni<v><tv><nn><p2><sg><o_pl> : wixenina
    katatam<v><tv><nn><p2><sg><o_sg> : kahtatamen #alternate form kotatamen
    katatam<v><tv><nn><p2><sg><o_pl> : kahtatamena #alternate form kotatamena
    katutam<v><tv><nn><p2><sg><o_sg> : kahtutamen
    katutam<v><tv><nn><p2><sg><o_pl> : kahtutamena
    shinkatam<v><tv><nn><p2><sg><o_sg> : wshinkatamen
    shinkatam<v><tv><nn><p2><sg><o_pl> : wshinkatamena
    hatun<v><tv><nn><p2><sg><o_sg> : wulhatun #also spelled walhatu ulhatu welatu
    hatun<v><tv><nn><p2><sg><o_pl> : wulhatuna

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch6) tv.nn p3.sg":
    papitu<v><tv><nn><p2><sg><o_sg> : papitun
    papitu<v><tv><nn><p2><sg><o_pl> : papituna
    pentam<v><tv><nn><p2><sg><o_sg> : pwentamen
    pentam<v><tv><nn><p2><sg><o_pl> : pwentamena
    pahsenem<v><tv><nn><p2><sg><o_sg> : pahsenemen
    pahsenem<v><tv><nn><p2><sg><o_pl> : pahsenemena

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch5) tv.nn p1.excl.pl":
    nem<v><tv><nn><p1><excl><pl><o_sg> : nemenen
    nem<v><tv><nn><p1><excl><pl><o_pl> : nemenena
    penam<v><tv><nn><p1><excl><pl><o_sg> : mpenamenen
    penam<v><tv><nn><p1><excl><pl><o_pl> : mpenamenena
    wixeni<v><tv><nn><p1><excl><pl><o_sg> : newixeninen
    wixeni<v><tv><nn><p1><excl><pl><o_pl> : newixeninena
    katatam<v><tv><nn><p1><excl><pl><o_sg> : nkatatamenen
    katatam<v><tv><nn><p1><excl><pl><o_pl> : nkatatamenena
    katutam<v><tv><nn><p1><excl><pl><o_sg> : nkatutamenen
    katutam<v><tv><nn><p1><excl><pl><o_pl> : nkatutamenena
    shinkatam<v><tv><nn><p1><excl><pl><o_sg> : nkshinkatamenen
    shinkatam<v><tv><nn><p1><excl><pl><o_pl> : nkshinkatamenena
    hatun<v><tv><nn><p1><excl><pl><o_sg> : nulhatuhena
    hatun<v><tv><nn><p1><excl><pl><o_pl> : nulhatuhena

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch6) tv.nn p1.excl.pl":
    papitu<v><tv><nn><p1><excl><pl><o_sg> : mpapitunen
    papitu<v><tv><nn><p1><excl><pl><o_pl> : mpapitunena
    pentam<v><tv><nn><p1><excl><pl><o_sg> : mpentamenen
    pentam<v><tv><nn><p1><excl><pl><o_pl> : mpentamenena
    pahsenem<v><tv><nn><p1><excl><pl><o_sg> : mpahsenemenen
    pahsenem<v><tv><nn><p1><excl><pl><o_pl> : mpahsenemenena

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch5) tv.nn p1.incl.pl":
    nem<v><tv><nn><p1><incl><pl><o_sg> : kenemenen
    nem<v><tv><nn><p1><incl><pl><o_pl> : kenemenena
    penam<v><tv><nn><p1><incl><pl><o_sg> : kepenamenen
    penam<v><tv><nn><p1><incl><pl><o_pl> : kepenamenena
    wixeni<v><tv><nn><p1><incl><pl><o_sg> : kewixeninen
    wixeni<v><tv><nn><p1><incl><pl><o_pl> : kewixeninena
    katatam<v><tv><nn><p1><incl><pl><o_sg> : katatamenen
    katatam<v><tv><nn><p1><incl><pl><o_pl> : katatamenena
    katutam<v><tv><nn><p1><incl><pl><o_sg> : katutamenen
    katutam<v><tv><nn><p1><incl><pl><o_pl> : katutamenena
    shinkatam<v><tv><nn><p1><incl><pl><o_sg> : kshinkatamenen
    shinkatam<v><tv><nn><p1><incl><pl><o_pl> : kshinkatamenena
    hatun<v><tv><nn><p1><incl><pl><o_sg> : kulhatuhena
    hatun<v><tv><nn><p1><incl><pl><o_pl> : kulhatuhena

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch6) tv.nn p1.incl.pl":
    papitu<v><tv><nn><p1><incl><pl><o_sg> : kpapitunen
    papitu<v><tv><nn><p1><incl><pl><o_pl> : kpapitunena
    pentam<v><tv><nn><p1><incl><pl><o_sg> : kpentamenen
    pentam<v><tv><nn><p1><incl><pl><o_pl> : kpentamenena
    pahsenem<v><tv><nn><p1><incl><pl><o_sg> : kpahsenemenen
    pahsenem<v><tv><nn><p1><incl><pl><o_pl> : kpahsenemenena

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch5) tv.nn p2.pl":
    nem<v><tv><nn><p2><pl> : kenemeneyo
    penam<v><tv><nn><p2><pl> : kepenameneyo
    wixeni<v><tv><nn><p2><pl> : kewixenineyo
    katatam<v><tv><nn><p2><pl> : katatameneyo
    katutam<v><tv><nn><p2><pl> : katutameneyo
    shinkatam<v><tv><nn><p2><pl> : kshinkatameneyo
    hatun<v><tv><nn><p2><pl> : kulhatuhemo

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch6) tv.nn p2.pl":
    papitu<v><tv><nn><p2><pl> : kpapituneyo
    pentam<v><tv><nn><p2><pl> : kpentameneyo
    pahsenem<v><tv><nn><p2><pl> : kpahsenemeneyo

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch5) tv.nn p3.pl":
    nem<v><tv><nn><p3><pl> : wenemeneyo
    penam<v><tv><nn><p3><pl> : pwenameneyo
    wixeni<v><tv><nn><p3><pl> : wixenineyo
    katatam<v><tv><nn><p3><pl> : kahtatameneyo #alternate form kotatameneyo
    katutam<v><tv><nn><p3><pl> : kahtutameneyo #alternate form kotatameyo
    shinkatam<v><tv><nn><p3><pl> : wshinkatameneyo
    hatun<v><tv><nn><p3><pl> : wulhatuwak

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch6) tv.nn p3.pl":
    papitu<v><tv><nn><p3><pl> : papituneyo
    pentam<v><tv><nn><p3><pl> : pwentameneyo
    pahsenem<v><tv><nn><p3><pl> : pahsenemeneyo

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch7) tv.nn p1.sg":
    tankhitu<v><tv><nn><p1><sg><o_sg> : ntankhitun
    tankhitu<v><tv><nn><p1><sg><o_pl> : ntankhituna
    maxkam<v><tv><nn><p1><sg><o_sg> : nemaxkamen
    maxkam<v><tv><nn><p1><sg><o_pl> : nemaxkamena
    kaxksem<v><tv><nn><p1><sg><o_sg> : nkaxksemen
    kaxksem<v><tv><nn><p1><sg><o_pl> : nkaxksemena

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch7) tv.nn p2.sg":
    tankhitu<v><tv><nn><p2><sg><o_sg> : ktankhitun
    tankhitu<v><tv><nn><p2><sg><o_pl> : ktankhituna
    maxkam<v><tv><nn><p2><sg><o_sg> : kemaxkamen
    maxkam<v><tv><nn><p2><sg><o_pl> : kemaxkamena
    kaxksem<v><tv><nn><p2><sg><o_sg> : kaxksemen
    kaxksem<v><tv><nn><p2><sg><o_pl> : kaxksemena

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch7) tv.nn p3.sg":
    tankhitu<v><tv><nn><p2><sg><o_sg> : tonkhitun
    tankhitu<v><tv><nn><p2><sg><o_pl> : tonkhituna
    maxkam<v><tv><nn><p2><sg><o_sg> : amoxkamen   #"a" was added in () at head
    maxkam<v><tv><nn><p2><sg><o_pl> : amoxkamena  #"a" was added in () at head
    kaxksem<v><tv><nn><p2><sg><o_sg> : koxksemen
    kaxksem<v><tv><nn><p2><sg><o_pl> : koxksemena

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch7) tv.nn p1.excl.pl":
    tankhitu<v><tv><nn><p1><excl><pl><o_sg> : ntankhitunen
    tankhitu<v><tv><nn><p1><excl><pl><o_pl> : ntankhitunena
    maxkam<v><tv><nn><p1><excl><pl><o_sg> : nemaxkamenen
    maxkam<v><tv><nn><p1><excl><pl><o_pl> : nemaxkamenena
    kaxksem<v><tv><nn><p1><excl><pl><o_sg> : nkaxksemenen
    kaxksem<v><tv><nn><p1><excl><pl><o_pl> : nkaxksemenena

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch7) tv.nn p1.incl.pl":
    tankhitu<v><tv><nn><p1><incl><pl><o_sg> : ktankhitunen
    tankhitu<v><tv><nn><p1><incl><pl><o_pl> : ktankhitunena
    maxkam<v><tv><nn><p1><incl><pl><o_sg> : kemaxkamenen
    maxkam<v><tv><nn><p1><incl><pl><o_pl> : kemaxkamenena
    kaxksem<v><tv><nn><p1><incl><pl><o_sg> : kaxksemenen
    kaxksem<v><tv><nn><p1><incl><pl><o_pl> : kaxksemenena

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch7) tv.nn p2.pl":
    tankhitu<v><tv><nn><p2><pl> : ktankhituneyo
    maxkam<v><tv><nn><p2><pl> : kemaxkameneyo
    kaxksem<v><tv><nn><p2><pl> : kaxksemeneyo

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch7) tv.nn p3.pl":
    tankhitu<v><tv><nn><p3><pl> : tonkhituneyo
    maxkam<v><tv><nn><p3><pl> : moxkameneyo #alternate form maxkamaneyo
    kaxksem<v><tv><nn><p3><pl> : koxksemeneyo #a crossed out after "m" and replaced with "e"

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch9) tv.nn p1.sg":
    metakohm<v><tv><nn><p1><sg><o_sg> : nemetakhomen
    metakohm<v><tv><nn><p1><sg><o_pl> : nemetakhomena
    kwetenem<v><tv><nn><p1><sg><o_sg> : nkwetenemen
    kwetenem<v><tv><nn><p1><sg><o_pl> : nkwetenemena

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch10) tv.nn p1.sg":
    watu<v><tv><nn><p1><sg><o_sg> : nuwatun
    watu<v><tv><nn><p1><sg><o_pl> : nuwatuna
    wlamhitam<v><tv><nn><p1><sg><o_sg> : nulamhitamen  #"w" add at head in textbook
    wlamhitam<v><tv><nn><p1><sg><o_pl> : nulamhitamena

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch9) tv.nn p2.sg":
    metakohm<v><tv><nn><p2><sg><o_sg> : kemetakhomen
    metakohm<v><tv><nn><p2><sg><o_pl> : kemetakhomena
    kwetenem<v><tv><nn><p2><sg><o_sg> : kwetenemen
    kwetenem<v><tv><nn><p2><sg><o_pl> : kwetenemena

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch10) tv.nn p2.sg":
    watu<v><tv><nn><p2><sg><o_sg> : kuwatun
    watu<v><tv><nn><p2><sg><o_pl> : kuwatuna
    wlamhitam<v><tv><nn><p2><sg><o_sg> : kulamhitamen
    wlamhitam<v><tv><nn><p2><sg><o_pl> : kulamhitamena

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch9) tv.nn p3.sg":
    metakohm<v><tv><nn><p2><sg><o_sg> : metakhomen
    metakohm<v><tv><nn><p2><sg><o_pl> : metakhomena
    kwetenem<v><tv><nn><p2><sg><o_sg> : kwetenemen
    kwetenem<v><tv><nn><p2><sg><o_pl> : kwetenemena
  
  "[lexc/twol] (Ch10) tv.nn p3.sg":
    watu<v><tv><nn><p2><sg><o_sg> : uwatun
    watu<v><tv><nn><p2><sg><o_pl> : uwatuna
    wlamhitam<v><tv><nn><p2><sg><o_sg> : welemhitamen
    wlamhitam<v><tv><nn><p2><sg><o_pl> : welemhitamena

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch9) tv.nn p1.excl.pl":
    metakohm<v><tv><nn><p1><excl><pl><o_sg> : nemetakhomenen
    metakohm<v><tv><nn><p1><excl><pl><o_pl> : nemetakhomenena
    kwetenem<v><tv><nn><p1><excl><pl><o_sg> : nkwetenemenen
    kwetenem<v><tv><nn><p1><excl><pl><o_pl> : nkwetenemenena

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch10) tv.nn p1.excl.pl":
    watu<v><tv><nn><p1><excl><pl><o_sg> : nuwatunen
    watu<v><tv><nn><p1><excl><pl><o_pl> : nuwatunena
    wlamhitam<v><tv><nn><p1><excl><pl><o_sg> : nulamhitamenen
    wlamhitam<v><tv><nn><p1><excl><pl><o_pl> : nulamhitamenena

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch9) tv.nn p1.incl.pl":
    metakohm<v><tv><nn><p1><incl><pl><o_sg> : kemetakohmenen
    metakohm<v><tv><nn><p1><incl><pl><o_pl> : kemetakohmenena
    kwetenem<v><tv><nn><p1><incl><pl><o_sg> : kwetenemenen
    kwetenem<v><tv><nn><p1><incl><pl><o_pl> : kwetenemenena

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch10) tv.nn p1.incl.pl":
    watu<v><tv><nn><p1><incl><pl><o_sg> : kuwatunen
    watu<v><tv><nn><p1><incl><pl><o_pl> : kuwatunena
    wlamhitam<v><tv><nn><p1><incl><pl><o_sg> : kulamhitamenen
    wlamhitam<v><tv><nn><p1><incl><pl><o_pl> : kulamhitamenena

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch9) tv.nn p2.pl":
    metakohm<v><tv><nn><p2><pl> : kemetakhomeneyo
    kwetenem<v><tv><nn><p2><pl> : kwetenemeneyo
